Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 3. Financial Provisions.

Sec. 44.83.100.
Bonds of the authority.

The authority may borrow money and may issue bonds, including but not limited to bonds on which the principal and interest are payable (1) exclusively from the income and receipts or other money derived from the project financed with the proceeds of the bonds; (2) exclusively from the income and receipts or other money derived from designated projects whether or not they are financed in whole or in part with the proceeds of the bonds; (3) from its income and receipts or other assets generally, or a designated part or parts of them; or (4) from one or more revenue-producing contracts including a contract providing for the security of the bonds made by the authority with any person. The authority may issue bonds to pay, fund, or refund the principal of, or interest or redemption premiums on, bonds issued by it, whether or not the bonds or interest to be funded or refunded have become due.

Bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the authority, and shall be dated and shall mature as the resolution may provide, except that no bond may mature more than 50 years from the date of its issue. Bonds shall bear interest at the rates, be in the denominations, be in the form, either coupon or registered, carry the registration privileges, be executed in the manner, be payable in the medium of payment, at the places, and be subject to the terms of redemption which the resolution or a subsequent resolution may provide.

All bonds, regardless of form or character, shall be negotiable instruments for all the purposes of AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29 (Uniform Commercial Code).

All bonds may be sold at public or private sale in the manner, for the price or prices, and at the time or times which the authority may determine.

History.

(§ 1 ch 278 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.56.100. Renumbered in 1980. In 1993, under § 13, ch. 34, SLA 1993 and § 128, ch. 35, SLA 1993 the citation to the Uniform Commercial Code was revised.

In 2000, “AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29” was substituted for “AS 45.01 — AS
45.09, AS 45.12, and AS 45.14” in accordance with § 35, ch. 113, SLA 2000.

Sec. 44.83.105.
Bonds for power projects under the energy program for Alaska. [Repealed, § 28 ch 18 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 44.83.110.
Trust indentures and trust agreements.

In the discretion of the authority, an issue of bonds may be secured by a trust indenture or trust agreement between the authority and a corporate trustee (which may be a trust company, bank, or national banking association, with corporate trust powers, located inside or outside the state) or by a secured loan agreement or other instrument or under a resolution giving powers to a corporate trustee by means of which the authority may

make and enter into any and all the covenants and agreements with the trustee or the holders of the bonds that the authority may determine to be necessary or desirable, including, without limitation, covenants, provisions, limitations, and agreements as to

the application, investment, deposit, use, and disposition of the proceeds of bonds of the authority or of money or other property of the authority or in which it has an interest;

the fixing and collection of rentals, charges, fees, or other consideration for, and the other terms to be incorporated in, contracts with respect to a project or to generated power;

the assignment by the authority of its rights in contracts with respect to a project or to generated power or in a mortgage or other security interest created with respect to a project or generated power to a trustee for the benefit of bondholders;

the terms and conditions upon which additional bonds of the authority may be issued;

the vesting in a trustee of rights, powers, duties, funds, or property in trust for the benefit of bondholders, including, without limitation, the right to enforce payment, performance, and all other rights of the authority or of the bondholders, under a lease, power of contract, contract of sale, mortgage, security agreement, or trust agreement with respect to a project by injunction or other proceeding or by taking possession of by agent or otherwise and operating a project and collecting rents or other consideration and applying the same in accordance with the trust agreement;

pledge, mortgage, or assign money, leases, agreements, property, or other rights or assets of the authority either presently in hand or to be received in the future, or both; and

provide for any other matters of like or different character that in any way affect the security or protection of the bonds.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the trust indenture, trust agreement, secured loan agreement, or other instrument or the resolution constituting a contract with bondholders shall contain a covenant by the authority that it will at all times maintain rates, fees, or charges sufficient to pay, and that a contract entered into by the authority for the sale, transmission, or distribution of power shall contain rates, fees, or charges sufficient to pay the costs of operation and maintenance of the project, the principal of and interest on bonds issued under the trust agreement as the same severally become due and payable, to provide for debt service coverage as considered necessary by the authority for the marketing of its bonds and to provide for renewals, replacements, and improvements of the project, and to maintain reserves required by the terms of the trust agreement. This subsection does not require a covenant that varies from a covenant entered into in accordance with the provisions of former AS

44.83.380

—

44.83.425

.

For the purpose of securing any one or more issues of its bonds, the authority may establish one or more special funds, called “capital reserve funds”, and shall pay into those capital reserve funds the proceeds of the sale of its bonds and any other money that may be made available to the authority for the purposes of those funds from any other source. The funds shall be established only if the authority determines that the establishment would enhance the marketability of the bonds. All money held in a capital reserve fund, except as provided in this section, shall be used as required, solely for (1) the payment of the principal of, and interest on, bonds or of the sinking fund payments with respect to those bonds, (2) the purchase or redemption of bonds, or (3) the payment of a redemption premium required to be paid when those bonds are redeemed before maturity; however, money in a fund may not be withdrawn from it at any time in an amount that would reduce the amount of that fund to less than the capital reserve requirement set out in (2) of this subsection, except for the purpose of making, with respect to those bonds, payment, when due, of principal, interest, redemption premiums, and the sinking fund payments for the payment of which other money of the authority is not available. Income or interest earned by, or increment to, a capital reserve fund, due to the investment of the fund or any other amounts in it, may be transferred by the authority to other funds or accounts of the authority to the extent that the transfer does not reduce the amount of the capital reserve fund below the capital reserve fund requirement.

If the authority decides to issue bonds secured by such a capital reserve fund, the bonds may not be issued if the amount in the capital reserve fund is less than such an amount as may be established by resolution of the authority (called the “capital reserve fund requirement”), unless the authority, at the time of issuance of the obligations, deposits in the capital reserve fund from the proceeds of the obligations to be issued or from other sources, an amount which, together with the amount then in the fund, will not be less than the capital reserve fund requirement.

In computing the amount of a capital reserve fund for the purpose of this section, securities in which all or a portion of the funds are invested shall be valued by some reasonable method established by the authority by resolution. Valuation on a particular date shall include the amount of any interest earned or accrued to that date.

The chairman of the authority shall annually, no later than January 2, make and deliver to the governor and the legislature a certificate stating the sum, if any, required to restore any capital reserve fund to the capital reserve fund requirement. The legislature may appropriate such a sum, and all sums appropriated during the then current fiscal year by the legislature for such restoration shall be deposited by the authority in the proper capital reserve fund. Nothing in this section creates a debt or liability of the state.

When the authority has created and established a capital reserve fund, the commissioner of revenue may lend surplus money in the general fund to the authority for deposit in a capital reserve fund in an amount equal to the capital reserve fund requirement. The loans shall be made on such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon by the commissioner of revenue and the authority, including without limitation terms and conditions providing that the loans need not be repaid until the obligations of the authority secured and to be secured by the capital reserve fund are no longer outstanding.

If the authority decides to covenant to issue or to issue bonds secured by a capital reserve fund, the bonds may not be issued until 10 days after the authority has mailed notification to the state bond committee and the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee by certified mail of its intention to establish a capital reserve fund to secure the bond issue. The notification shall include the amount of the capital reserve fund to be established, the amount of bonds proposed to be issued, and the total cost of the project for which the bonds are to be issued. The notification shall be accompanied by an estimate by the authority of the need to withdraw money from the capital reserve fund during the term of the bond issue, the amount that it may be necessary to withdraw, and the time at which withdrawals are estimated to be needed. The authority shall annually prepare a revised estimate, considering the same factors, and a statement of all withdrawals that have occurred from the date of issuance of the bonds to the end of the calendar year. The revised estimate and statement shall be submitted to the state bond committee and the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee by January 30 of the succeeding year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 278 SLA 1976; am §§ 13, 14 ch 156 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 133 SLA 1982; am § 5 ch 89 SLA 1983; am § 12 ch 18 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.56.110. Renumbered in 1980.

Cross references. —

For provisions establishing the state bond committee, see AS

37.15.110

.

Sec. 44.83.120.
Validity of pledge.

It is the intention of the legislature that a pledge made in respect of bonds is considered perfected and is valid and binding from the time the pledge is made; that the money or property so pledged and thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without physical delivery or further act; and that the lien of the pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the authority irrespective of whether the parties have notice. Neither the resolution, trust agreement, nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded or filed under the provisions of AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29 (Uniform Commercial Code) to be perfected or to be valid, binding, or effective against the parties.

History.

(§ 1 ch 278 SLA 1976; am § 6 ch 89 SLA 1983)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29” was substituted for “AS 45.01 — AS
45.09, AS 45.12, and AS 45.14” in accordance with § 35, ch. 113, SLA 2000.

Sec. 44.83.130.
Nonliability on bonds.

Neither the members of the authority nor a person executing the bonds is liable personally on the bonds or is subject to personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance of the bonds.

The bonds issued by the authority do not constitute an indebtedness or other liability of the state or of a political subdivision of the state, except the authority, but shall be payable solely from the income and receipts or other funds or property of the authority. The authority may not pledge the faith or credit of the state or of a political subdivision of the state, except the authority, to the payment of a bond and the issuance of a bond by the authority does not directly or indirectly or contingently obligate the state or a political subdivision of the state to apply money from, or levy or pledge any form of taxation whatever to the payment of the bond.

History.

(§ 1 ch 278 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.56.130. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.83.140.
Pledge of the state.

The state pledges to and agrees with the holders of bonds issued under this chapter and with the federal agency which loans or contributes funds in respect to a project, that the state will not limit or alter the rights and powers vested in the authority by this chapter to fulfill the terms of a contract made by the authority with the holders or federal agency, or in any way impair the rights and remedies of the holders until the bonds, together with the interest on them with interest on unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with an action or proceeding by or on behalf of the holders, are fully met and discharged. The authority is authorized to include this pledge and agreement of the state, insofar as it refers to holders of bonds of the authority, in a contract with the holders, and insofar as it relates to a federal agency, in a contract with the federal agency.

History.

(§ 1 ch 278 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.56.140. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.83.150.
Tax exemption.

All property of the authority is public property devoted to an essential public and governmental function and purpose and is exempt from all taxes of the state or a political subdivision of the state; however, the authority may make payments in place of taxes in amounts equal to the real and personal property taxes that would be assessed on its real and personal property by each political subdivision in which its property is located to the same extent as if that property were private property and the authority were a non-public corporation.
All bonds issued under this chapter are issued by a body corporate and public of this state and for an essential public and governmental purpose and the bonds and the interest and income on and from the bonds and all income of the authority are exempt from taxation except for transfer, inheritance, and estate taxes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 278 SLA 1976; am § 15 ch 156 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.56.150. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.83.160.
Bonds legal investments for fiduciaries.

The bonds of the authority are securities in which all public officers and bodies of the state and all municipalities and municipal subdivisions, all insurance companies and associations and other persons carrying on any insurance business, all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks, savings associations, including savings and loan associations and building and loan associations, investment companies and other persons carrying on a banking business, all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees and other fiduciaries, and all other persons whatsoever who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state, may properly and legally invest funds including capital in their control or belonging to them. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the bonds of the authority are also securities that may be deposited with and may be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and municipal subdivisions for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of the state is now or may hereafter be authorized.

History.

(§ 1 ch 278 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.56.160. Renumbered in 1980.

Secs. 44.83.162 — 44.83.165.
Power cost equalization. [Repealed, § 28 ch 18 SLA 1993. For present law, see AS 42.45.100 — 42.45.190.]

Sec. 44.83.170.
Power project fund. [Repealed, § 28 ch 18 SLA 1993. For present law, see AS 42.45.010.]

Secs. 44.83.177 — 44.83.185.
Reconnaissance and feasibility studies. [Repealed, § 28 ch 18 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 44.83.186.
Final cost estimate and reauthorization by the legislature. [Repealed, § 27 ch 89 SLA 1983.]

Secs. 44.83.187 — 44.83.189.
Applicability of sections; project construction. [Repealed, § 28 ch 18 SLA 1993.]

Secs. 44.83.190 — 44.83.240.
[Renumbered as AS 44.83.900 — 44.83.995.]

Secs. 44.83.300 — 44.83.360.
Susitna River hydroelectric project. [Repealed, § 28 ch 18 SLA 1993.]

Secs. 44.83.361,
44.83.363.
Rural electrification revolving loan fund. [Repealed, § 28 ch 18 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 44.83.370.
Electrical service extension fund established. [Repealed, § 28 ch 18 SLA 1993.]